Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.600

Youth court jurisdiction.

(1) Youth courts have authority over juveniles ages eight through seventeen who:

(a) Along with their parent, guardian, or legal custodian, voluntarily and in writing request youth court involvement;

(b) Admit they have committed the offense they are referred for;

(c) Along with their parent, guardian, or legal custodian, waive any privilege against self-incrimination concerning the offense; and

(d) Along with their parent, guardian, or legal custodian, agree to comply with the youth court disposition of the case.

(2) Youth courts shall not exercise authority over youth who are under the continuing jurisdiction of the juvenile court for law violations, including a youth with a matter pending before the juvenile court but which has not yet been adjudicated.

(3) Youth courts may decline to accept a youth for youth court disposition for any reason and may terminate a youth from youth court participation at any time.

(4) A youth or his or her parent, guardian, or legal custodian may withdraw from the youth court process at any time.

(5) Youth courts shall give any victims of a juvenile the opportunity to be notified, present, and heard in any youth court proceeding.

[ 2002 c 237 s 11.]